Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. State Archives, Museums and
Historical Department

Cross references. —

As to requirement that copies of compendium of all agency reports accompanying budget requests be furnished to state library, see § 9-2-1014(c).

§ 9-2-401.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

9-2-401

through

9-2-415

:

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 55, § 2.

“Department” means the department of state parks and cultural resources;

“Director” means the director of the department;

“Political subdivision” means a county, municipality, special district or other local government entity;

“Public record” includes the original and all copies of any paper, correspondence, form, book, photograph, photostat, film, microfilm, scan, sound recording, map, drawing or other document, regardless of physical, digital or electronic form or characteristics, which have been made or received in transacting public business by the state, a political subdivision or an agency of the state;

“Commission” means the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 9-208; Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 1; 1973, ch. 86, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-960, 9-3-980, 9-3-987; Laws 1979, ch. 40, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 140, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 55, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to public records generally, see chapter 4 of title 16.

The 2017 amendment

, in the middle of (a)(v), inserted “scan,” and inserted “digital or electronic”; and added (a)(vi).

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What are administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that affect members of public that must be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) (5 USCS § 552(a)(2)(C)), 139 ALR Fed 299.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(3)) 153 ALR Fed 571.

§§ 9-2-402 and 9-2-403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 55, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1953, ch. 143, §§ 1 and 2, related to the state library, archives, museums and historical board.

§ 9-2-404.
Creation of department; director; references to department.

The state archives, museums and historical sections within the department are created and shall be in the charge of the director. The director is subject to the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989.

The director shall:

Be a college graduate who has had work in social science and history or has educational and administrative experience satisfactory to the commission;

Perform the duties of the state historian, state archivist and museum curator;

Have an official seal as director which shall be used to authenticate all official documents, instruments and official acts of the department.

The director may:

Appoint necessary deputies, assistants and employees;

Acquire by gift, devise, bequest, donation, purchase, lease or otherwise, money, books, manuscripts and other personal property of historical value. He shall hold and own the property in the name of the state and provide for its restoration, care and preservation;

Sell books, pamphlets, papers, pictures or other material produced by the department;

Operate sales desks, or contract under terms determined by the commission with nonprofit and charitable corporations, to sell materials relevant to the interpretation of museums and historic sites;

Do anything necessary to implement W.S.

9-2-404

through

9-2-415

.

The proceeds received from sales authorized in subsection (c) of this section shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

Any statute or legal or other document which refers to the state archives and historical department means the department of state parks and cultural resources which is the successor agency to state archives, museums and historical department.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, §§ 10, 13 to 15; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-198, 9-208, 9-211, 9-212; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-901, 9-3-960, 9-3-963, 9-3-964; Laws 1979, ch. 40, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 140, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of public records to state archives, see §

9-2-408

.

As to depositing books with state librarian or director of state archives, museums and historical department, see §

9-2-1026

.6.

The 2017 amendment

, substituted “commission” for “board” in (b)(i) and (c)(iv).

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

Wyoming Government Reorganization Act. —

See §§

9-2-1701

, 9-2-1703(a)(x).

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 9-2-405.
Classifications of public records.

Public records shall be classified as follows:

Official public records include:

All original vouchers, receipts and other documents necessary to isolate and prove the validity of every transaction relating to the receipt, use and disposition of all public property and public income from all sources whatsoever;

All agreements and contracts to which the state or any agency or political subdivision thereof is a party;

All fidelity, surety and performance bonds in which the state is a beneficiary;

All claims filed against the state or any agency or political subdivision thereof;

All records or documents required by law to be filed with or kept by any agency of the state; and

All other documents or records determined by the records committee to be official public records.

Office files and memoranda include:

All records, correspondence, exhibits, books, booklets, drawings, maps, blank forms or documents not defined and classified as official public records;

All duplicate copies of official public records filed with any agency of the state or political subdivision thereof;

All documents and reports made for the internal administration of the office to which they pertain but not required by law to be filed or kept with the agency; and

All other documents or records determined by the records committee to be office files and memoranda.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-980; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of records committee, see §

9-2-411

.

As to public records generally, see ch. 4 of title 16.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-406.
Director; management of public records.

The director shall properly manage and safely keep all public records in his custody, and administer the state archives. He shall:

Manage the archives of the state;

Centralize the archives of the state to make them available for reference and scholarship and to insure their proper preservation;

Inspect, inventory, catalog and arrange retention and transfer schedules on all record files of all state departments and other agencies of state government;

Maintain and secure all state public records and establish safeguards against unauthorized removal or destruction;

Establish and operate state record centers for preserving, servicing, screening and protecting all state public records which must be preserved temporarily or permanently, but which need not be retained in office space and equipment. Centers established and operated pursuant to this paragraph may include one (1) or more digital repositories for temporary or permanent digital records;

Gather and disseminate to interested agencies information on all phases of records management and current practices, methods, procedures and devices for efficient and economical management of records;

Establish and operate a state imaging center in which all public records may be scanned or microfilmed. The center shall scan or microfilm public records approved by the head of the office of origin and by the director. All state departments, agencies and political subdivisions thereof shall consult with the director prior to scanning or microfilming within the departments, agencies or political subdivisions and shall comply with the standards for all scanning and microfilming which shall be established by the state archives. The center may scan or microfilm records which are required to be kept a specified length of time or permanently, or to be destroyed by specific methods or under specific supervision. When records are scanned or microfilmed, the reproductions may be substituted for the original documents and retained in lieu of the original documents and the original documents may be destroyed. One (1) copy shall be made and sent to the director whenever any process is used to reproduce public records scheduled for permanent retention with the intent of disposing of the original or copies of the original;

Maintain necessary facilities for the review of records approved for destruction and their economical disposition by any method approved by the records committee, and supervise the destruction of public records.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.2; Laws 1963, ch. 117, § 11; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-981; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “director,” see § 9-2-401(a)(iii).

As to transfer of public records to state archives, see §

9-2-408

.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a)(v), inserted “Centers established and operated pursuant to this paragraph may include one (1) or more digital repositories for temporary or permanent digital records” and made a related change; rewrote (a)(vii); and in (a)(viii), substituted “any method approved by the records committee” for “sale, shredding or burning.”

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-407.
Director; duties regarding public records in his custody.

The director shall collect, arrange and make available to the public at reasonable times in his office in original or reproduced form, all records in his custody not restricted by law, including official records of the state and its political subdivisions, of the United States or of foreign nations. He is the legal custodian of all public records in the custody of the commission.

The director may designate an employee of the department to serve as state archivist who may perform all the duties of the director under this act with respect to state records and archives. The director shall furnish certified copies or photocopies of records in his custody on payment in advance of fees prescribed by the department. Copies of public records transferred pursuant to law from the office of their origin to the custody of the director when certified under seal by the director to be true, complete and correct have the same legal force and effect as evidence as if certified by their original custodian, and shall be admissible in all courts and before all tribunals the same as the originals thereof.

The director has the right of reasonable access to and may examine all public records in Wyoming. He shall examine into and report to the commission on their condition. He shall require their custodians to put them in the custody and condition prescribed by law and to secure their custody, the recovery of records belonging to their offices, the delivery of records to their successors in office and the adoption of sound practices relative to the long-term preservation of records.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-209; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-961; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), inserted “or reproduced,” deleted “copied or microfilm copies of negatives” preceding “all records in,” and deleted “Wyoming parks and cultural resources” following “custody of the”; in (c), substituted “commission” for “board,” and substituted “long-term preservation of records” for “use of durable paper and ink, fireproof filing facilities and photographic processes for recording and copying.”

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

Meaning of “this act.” —

“This act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), refers to Laws 1990, ch. 44, which appears as various sections throughout titles 9, 11, 18, 31, 35 and 36. For tables of comparative sections, see volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes legitimate research justifying inspection of state or local public records not open to inspection by general public, 40 ALR4th 333.

Exhaustion of administrative remedies as prerequisite to judicial action to compel disclosure under state freedom of information acts, 114 ALR5th 283.

Legal services provided by law students as basis for award of attorneys' fees or other litigation costs in action under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(4)(E)), 73 ALR Fed 732.

When are government records “similar files” exempt from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act provision (5 USC § 552(b)(6)) exempting certain personnel, medical and “similar” files, 106 ALR Fed 94.

What are administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that affect members of public that must be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) (5 USC § 552(a)(2)(C)), 139 ALR Fed 299.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(3)) 153 ALR Fed 571.

§ 9-2-408.
Transfer of public records to archives; transfer of records of uncollectible accounts receivable to department; duties of department thereto.

All public records, not required in the current operation of the office where they are made or kept, and all records of every public office of the state, agency, commission, committee or any other activity of the state or political subdivisions which are abolished or discontinued, shall be transferred to the state archives. The transfer of records shall be in accordance with standards and procedures issued by the records committee and subject to an agreement that ensures the safety, preservation and public availability of the records. Any public officer in Wyoming may deliver to the director for preservation and administration records in his custody if the director is willing and able to receive and care for them.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 2.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.3; Laws 1973, ch. 52, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-982; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 221, § 2; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department,” see § 9-2-401(a)(ii).

As to the legislative service office audit division, see §§

28-8-107

,

28-8-108

.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), deleted “or to a recognized supplementary depository agency, selected by the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission” at the end of the first sentence; inserted “The transfer of records shall be in accordance with standards and procedures issued by the records committee and subject to an agreement that ensures the safety, preservation and public availability of the records”; and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

§ 9-2-409.
Designation of records officer by state departments or agencies; duties.

Each department or agency of the state government shall designate a records officer who shall supervise the departmental records program, review record retention schedules and represent the office in all departmental matters before the records committee. The records officer and the director shall prepare transfer schedules for the transfer of public records to the records centers or to the archives.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.4; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-983; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “director,” see § 9-2-401(a)(iii).

As to records committee, see §

9-2-411

.

The 2017 amendment,

inserted “review record retention schedules,” and deleted “who shall” preceding “represent the office.”

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

§ 9-2-410.
Records as property of state; delivery by outgoing officials and employees to successors; management and disposition thereof.

All public records are the property of the state. They shall be delivered by outgoing officials and employees to their successors and shall be preserved, stored, transferred, destroyed or disposed of, and otherwise managed, only in accordance with W.S.

9-2-405

through

9-2-413

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.5; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-984; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-2-411.
Records committee created; composition; expenses; meetings; action by majority vote; duties as to retention and disposition of public records.

The records committee is created to be composed of the director or his deputy, who shall act as chairman and secretary of the committee, the attorney general or his appointee and the director of the state department of audit or his appointee. Committee members shall serve without additional salary, but shall be entitled to traveling expenses incurred incident to committee business. Expenses shall be paid from the appropriations made for operation of their respective departments or offices. The records committee shall meet upon call by the chairman at least once every quarter. Action by the committee shall be by majority vote and records shall be kept of all committee business. When the disposition of records is considered by the records committee, it shall ascertain the recommendations of the head of the department or the departmental records officer. The records committee shall approve, modify or disapprove the recommendations on retention schedules of all public records and act upon requests to destroy any public records. Any modification of a request or recommendation shall be approved by the head of the agency originating the request or recommendation. The department shall provide forms, approved by the records committee, upon which it shall prepare recommendations to the committee in cooperation with the records officer of the department or other agency whose records are involved. The records committee may issue to state departments, agencies and political subdivisions thereof guidelines and best practices on records management and digital preservation.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.6; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-985; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department” as referred to near the beginning of last sentence in section, see § 9-2-401(a)(ii).

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to examination of accounts, see art. 4, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to disposition of original papers by clerks of court, see §

5-7-103

.

As to meetings of governmental agencies generally, see §§

16-4-401

to

16-4-407

.

As to state banking commissioner, see §

13-1-601

.

The 2017 amendment

, deleted “Upon written request of the department or agency head, the director shall furnish the film or a copy of the film to be retained by the department if deemed necessary or expedient by the records committee” following “request or recommendation”; and inserted the last sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

§ 9-2-412.
Destruction or disposition of public records; procedure.

Public records of the state and political subdivisions shall be disposed of in accordance with W.S.

9-2-411

. The records committee may approve a departmental written request upon proper and satisfactory showing that the retention of certain records for a minimum period of ten (10) years is unnecessary and uneconomical. Recommendations for the destruction or disposition of office files and memoranda shall be submitted to the records committee upon approved forms, prepared by the records officer of the agency concerned and the director. The committee shall determine the period of time that any office file or memorandum shall be preserved and may authorize the state archives to arrange for its destruction or disposition.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.7; Laws 1973, ch. 86, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-986; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of original papers by clerks of court, see §

5-7-103

.

The 2017 amendment

, at the end of the paragraph, substituted “state archives” for “division of archives, records management and centralized microfilm.”

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

Division of archives, records management and centralized microfilm. —

The division of archives, records management and centralized microfilm, referred to in the last sentence, does not exist. This is an apparent reference to the state archives, museums and historical department, created in §

9-2-404

, and its central microfilm division, established by the director of the department pursuant to §

9-2-406

.

§ 9-2-413.
Reproduction of public records of political subdivisions.

Subject to this section and with the approval of the governing body of the political subdivision, any department, agency, board or individual of any political subdivision may record or copy by any permanent reproductive process approved by the director as required in subsection (c) of this section any public record which the department, agency, board or individual of the political subdivision records, keeps, retains, or is by law, rule or regulation required to record, keep or retain for a period of years or permanently. The permanent reproduction is deemed the original or official copy of the public record so reproduced for all purposes. If any department, agency, board or individual of any political subdivision is required to record any writing or document in books or on other forms, recording done directly onto a permanent storage medium in lieu of the other required form of recordation constitutes compliance with the requirement. One (1) copy shall be made and sent to the director whenever any process is used to reproduce public records with the intent of disposing of the original or copies of the original. One (1) copy of all permanent reproductions shall be retained by the governmental entity or officer having custody of the writings or papers thus recorded or copied as the official copy.

If any document is presented for recording or notation in public records the document shall, after recording, be returned to the party from whom it was received. If the party cannot be located or refuses to accept it, the document shall be disposed of in accordance with W.S.

9-2-411

.

Prior to adopting any reproductive process, the governing body of a political subdivision shall consult with the director. If any of the public records which are reproduced pursuant to this section are permanent records or, under the laws, rules or regulations in effect at the time of reproduction, are required to be transferred at a later date to any agency or department of the state, the reproductive process shall be approved by the director as one which clearly and accurately makes copies that will last the time they are to be kept, or can be subsequently reproduced without distortions that substantially affect their legibility.

If the original documents are disposed of as allowed by law, the permanent reproduction retained by the local governmental entity or official shall be stored in a safe place and protected from destruction. Reproductions shall be available to the public for inspection in the same manner as the original documents would have been, and sufficient access shall be available to the public to permit inspection.

The clerk of district court shall not reproduce, for official record purposes, the files of any action or proceeding kept in his office until two (2) years have lapsed since the initial filing in the action or proceeding. The clerk of district court may make certified or other copies of documents in his office for individuals or officials.

In recording, reproducing or copying any public records as authorized by this section and in disposing of the originals or copies, no restrictions or provisions of law regarding recording, reproducing or copying, or the disposition of originals or copies inconsistent with this section apply to the governmental entity or its officers, agents and employees.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 86, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.7:1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-987; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2017 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “director,” see § 9-2-401(a)(iii).

As to disposition of original papers by clerks of court generally, see §

5-7-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes legitimate research justifying inspection of state or local public records not open to inspection by general public, 40 ALR4th 333.

The 2017 amendment

, deleted “microfilm, microphotograph, microphotographic, photostatic” and similar language throughout; in (a), substituted “process approved by the director as required in subsection (c) of this section” for “device,” substituted “One (1) copy” for “A master negative of microfilm or microphotographs” preceding “shall be made, inserted “and sent to the director,” deleted “The master negative shall be sent to the director” following “copies of the original,” and substituted “permanent reproductions” for “master negatives” in the last sentence; in (d), substituted “the permanent reproduction” for “the set of official microfilm,” substituted “Reproductions” for “The official microfilm” at the beginning of the second sentence, and substituted “access” for microfilm and microphotographic readers or other suitable devices.”

Laws 2017, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 1, 2017.

§ 9-2-414.
Department of commerce; powers and duties relative to museums, historical sites and parks.

The director may:

Assemble and collect archaeological and ethnological collections, relics of the history of the state and material illustrative of the natural history of the state, and works of art;

Preserve, repair and display in an orderly and educational manner the materials in the possession of the department;

Store and maintain these materials in the Wyoming state museum, the Wyoming state art gallery and other facilities.

The department shall:

Supervise, maintain, restore, interpret and control museums or historical sites;

Prepare and arrange all items, objects, furnishings and information in the museums and historical sites;

Furnish and supervise employees in the museums and historical sites;

Approve and perform or supervise restorations, improvements, changes and alterations of museums, historic sites and parks under the control of the department;

Interpret historic sites, museums and parks by arranging and preparing all items, objects, furnishings and information relating to historic sites, museums and parks;

Assume and exercise responsibilities as the state historic preservation officer (SHPO), including supervising and assisting the Wyoming consulting committee on nominations to the national register of historic places and to implement the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. § 470 et seq.), as amended;

Research and prepare legends for all historic monuments and markers;

Consult with the parks and cultural resources commission on archives, museums and historical related activities.

As used in this section, “museums” and “historical sites” includes Trails End, Fort Fetterman, Historic Governor’s Mansion, Fort Phil Kearney (including the Wagon Box Fight Site and Fetterman Massacre Site), Wyoming State Museum and Fort Bridger.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 12; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-210, 9-212.2; Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 2; 1963, ch. 117, § 11; 1969, ch. 12, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-962, 9-3-981; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 20, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 55, § 1.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “director,” see § 9-2-401(a)(iii).

As to the Wyoming parks and cultural commission, see §§

36-4-101

through

36-4-115

and

36-4-117

through

36-4-123

.

§ 9-2-415.
Director; duties relative to promotion of history of state and region.

The director shall:

Collect books, maps, charts, documents, manuscripts, other papers and any obtainable documentary material illustrative of the history and development of the state and region;

Collect, compile and publish data of the events which mark the progress of Wyoming from its earliest day to the present time, through the medium of a state historical periodical, to be published as and when the board directs;

Procure facts and statements relative to the history and ethnology of the Indian tribes and other inhabitants within the state;

File and carefully preserve all the historical data collected or obtained and arrange and classify it so it is readily accessible for disseminating historical or biographical information requested by the public;

Accept and receive gifts;

Promote the founding and development of a state historical society and of county historical societies; and

Create and maintain local and statewide interest in the history of the state and region.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 9-211; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-963; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-416.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 6.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1959, ch. 26, §§ 1 through 4, related to various duties of the state library, archives, museums and historical board.

§§ 9-2-417 and 9-2-418.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

9-2-1026

.6 and

9-2-1026

.7 by Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 4.

§ 9-2-419.
Marking, defacing, removing or tampering with certain materials; penalty.

Any person marking, defacing, removing or tampering in any manner whatsoever with any property acquired under W.S.

9-2-404

through

9-2-415

, by the director or, acquired under W.S.

9-2-3210

through

9-2-3212

by the state librarian or state library board is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 77, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.8; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-988; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1998, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3210” for “9-2-1026.5” and “9-2-3212” for “9-2-1026.7.”

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§§ 9-2-420 through 9-2-425.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

9-2-1026

.8 through

9-2-1026

.13 by Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5.